praksid/praks5/Veskimae_kodutoo5/veskimae_jätkud.lexc
LEXICON tüüp_viis
  +Sg+Nom:%>s ;
         :%>e ; 
  +Sg+Part:%>t ;             
      +Pl:%>e ; 
 +Pl+Part:%>e ;

LEXICON tüüp_paar
  +Sg+Nom: # ;
         :i 2C ;

LEXICON tüüp_sada
   +Sg+Nom: # ;
	  :%{NA%} sg_gen_jt ; 
  +Sg+Part: # ;
   +Pl+Gen:%>de ;
       +Pl:%>de semkäänded ;
  +Pl+Part:%>sid ;

LEXICON tüüp_kümmend
  +Sg+Nom:%>end ;
         :%>ne sg_gen_jt ; 
 +Sg+Part:%>et ;             
      +Pl:%>nete semkäänded ; 
  +Pl+Part:%>neid ;

LEXICON sg_gen_jt
  +Sg+Gen: # ;
      +Sg: semkäänded ;
  +Pl+Nom:%>d ;

LEXICON 2C
	: sg_gen_jt ; 
+Sg+Part: # ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>de ;
     +Pl:%>de semkäänded ;
+Pl+Part:%>sid ;

LEXICON semkäänded
    +Gen: # ;
    +Ill: %>sse ;
    +Ine: %>s ;
    +Ela: %>st ;
    +All: %>le ;
    +Ade: %>l ;
    +Abl: %>lt ;
    +Trl: %>ks ;
    +Ter: %>ni ;
    +Ess: %>na ;
    +Abe: %>ta ;
    +Com: %>ga ;
